Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 31
DESTRUCTION OF FOOD PRODUCTS

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Food and Drug Act", see part 4 of article 5 of title 25; for the "Colorado Hazardous Substances Act of 1973", see part 5 of article 5 of title 25.

Section

PART 1 PUBLIC ENFORCEMENT

PART 2 CIVIL DAMAGES FOR
THE PROTECTION OF
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS